Wyoming, session 2025, SF0164.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-104(f)(ix) and by creating new
paragraphs (xxxvi) and (xxxvii) is amended to read:

11-25-104. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of
financial interest in events.

(f) Each permittee, licensee, any current and
prospective employee, volunteer and contract employee of a
permittee or licensee and each person who has access to
SF0164

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0731
restricted areas or animals housed on permitted event
grounds for horse racing or for pari-mutuel activities
shall be licensed by the commission and shall comply with
all rules and regulations and all orders issued by the
commission. No person shall hold any event with pari-mutuel
wagering without obtaining a permit. The commission may
require that all permittees, licensees, current and
prospective employees, volunteers and contract employees of
a permittee or licensee and each person who has access to
restricted areas or animals housed on permitted event
grounds for horse racing or for pari-mutuel activities
submit fingerprints to the Wyoming division of criminal
investigation to perform a criminal history background
check pursuant to W.S. 7-19-201 in order to obtain state
and national criminal history record information. The
division may share the results of the criminal history
background check with the commission pursuant to W.S.
7-19-106(a)(xxxv). For purposes of this subsection,
permittees, licensees, current and prospective employees,
volunteers and contract employees of a permittee or
licensee, shall include the following as defined:

SF0164

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0731
(ix) "Groom" means a person who cleans stalls,
bathes, brushes and provides general care to a race horse
or pari-mutuel rodeo event animal;

(xxxvi) "Rodeo contestant" means a person who is
a contestant in a pari-mutuel rodeo event;

(xxxvii) "Rodeo stock contractor" means a person
who provides livestock for a pari-mutuel rodeo event.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0164